Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202687-1410
Act, how construed.

The Agricultural Data Privacy Act shall not be construed to:

(1) Limit or supersede any duty or obligation that is imposed by any federal law or any other law of the State of Nebraska;

(2) Relieve any person from any duty or obligation otherwise imposed by law;

(3) Impair, supersede, or otherwise affect the terms of any private contract that is in existence prior to July 18, 2026; or

(4) Limit or supersede any duty or obligation that is imposed by any natural resources district that is operating pursuant to Chapter 2, article 32, any agency as defined in section 84-901, or any employee or agent of such natural resources district or state agency when acting in performance of a statutory duty.

Laws 2026, LB525, § 10.
July 18, 2026